Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.190

Effect of favorable vote.

If a majority of the voters voting upon the adoption of the proposed new, altered or revised charter favor it, it shall become the charter of the city and the organic law thereof, superseding any existing charter. All bodies or offices abolished or dispensed with by the new, altered or revised charter, together with the emoluments thereof shall immediately cease to exist, and any new offices created shall be filled by appointment of the mayor until the next general election subject to such approval by the city council as may be required by the new, altered or revised charter.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.190. Prior: (i) 1925 ex.s. c 137 s 2, part; 1895 c 27 s 2, part; RRS s 8956, part. (ii) 1895 c 27 s 6; RRS s 8962.]

NOTES:

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.